District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.69

Merger or consolidation — Effective date.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 208, ch. 269, § 69
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-101.69.
1981 Ed., § 29-369.
1973 Ed., § 29-927e.

Prior Codifications